Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.110

Refunding and other bonds may be issued in combination.

Refunding bonds and bonds for any other purpose or purposes authorized may be issued separately or issued in combination in one or more series or issues by the same issuer.

[ 1999 c 230 s 10; 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 12.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—Severability—1999 c 230: See notes following RCW 39.53.010.